California, session 20252026, SB1428.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3190.9 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:3190.9. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.(b) The authorization issued pursuant to Section 3190.1 shall terminate upon the repeal of this article.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the absence of another program authorizing the use of gravity-based energy storage wells, idle wells that are authorized to be used as gravity-based energy storage wells under this article shall be reclassified, upon the repeal of this article, as idle wells subject to Section 3206 and other applicable law.SEC. 2. Section 4770 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4770. For purposes of this article, “task force” means the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force described in Section 4005.SEC. 3. Section 71205.3 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71205.3. (a) The commission shall adopt regulations that do all of the following:(1) Effective on the date that federal regulations implemented pursuant to subsection (p) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code become effective, require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to implement the ballast water discharge performance standards set forth in Section 139.10(d) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as that regulation may be amended.(2) Effective on the date that federal regulations implemented pursuant to subsection (p) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code become effective, require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to comply with the implementation schedule set forth in the federal regulations implemented pursuant to subsection (p) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code.(3) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to implement the interim performance standards for the discharge of ballast water recommended in accordance with Table X-1 of the California State Lands Commission Report on Performance Standards for Ballast Water Discharges in California Waters, as approved by the commission on January 26, 2006, by January 1, 2030.(4) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to meet the final performance standard for the discharge of ballast water of zero detectable living organisms for all organism size classes no later than January 1, 2040. If, based on a review of ballast water treatment technologies submitted in a report to the Legislature in conformance with provisions of subdivision (b), achievement of the final performance standard becomes practicable sooner than January 1, 2040, the commission shall establish an earlier effective date in regulation.(b) (1) If a ballast water treatment system has stopped operating properly during a voyage, the master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the vessel shall report the problem to the commission as soon as practicable.(2)  The commission shall consult with the United States Coast Guard to attempt to identify an alternative, environmentally sound method of ballast water management under the circumstances described in paragraph (1) in accordance with regulations implemented pursuant to subsection (p) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code and Section 151.2040(b) of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the vessel subject to paragraph (1) shall employ the alternative, environmentally sound method of ballast water management identified by the commission in consultation with the United States Coast Guard before discharging ballast water in California waters.(c) (1) Not less than 18 months before January 1, 2030, and January 1, 2040, the commission, in consultation with the board, the United States Coast Guard, and an advisory panel described in paragraph (3), shall prepare, or update, and submit to the Legislature a report on the efficacy, availability, and environmental impacts, including the effect on water quality, of currently available technologies for ballast water treatment systems. If technologies to meet the performance standards are determined in a review to be unavailable, the commission shall include in that review an assessment of why the technologies are unavailable.(2) The advisory panel described in paragraph (3) shall make recommendations regarding the content and issuance of the report and implementation of the performance standards to the commission.(3) (A) The advisory panel shall include, but not be limited to, representatives from one or more state regional water quality control boards, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the United States Coast Guard, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and other persons representing shipping, port, conservation, fishing, aquaculture, agriculture, and public water agency interests. The commission shall ensure that the advisory panel meets in a manner that facilitates the effective participation of both the public and private members. The advisory panel’s meetings shall be open to the public.(B) The commission shall provide notice of the advisory panel’s meetings to any person who requests that notice in writing, as well as on the commission’s internet website. The commission shall provide that notice at least 10 days before an advisory panel meeting and shall include the meeting’s agenda and the name, address, and telephone number of a person who can provide additional information before the meeting.(4) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2034, for the interim performance standard, and January 1, 2044, for the final performance standard, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(B) A report required to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. Section 4 of Chapter 578 of the Statutes of 2025 is amended to read:SEC. 4. (a) (1) The use restrictions imposed by the granting statutes and the public trust doctrine are lifted until February 1, 2066, with respect to the after-acquired lands in Jack London Square, and the port may lease the after-acquired lands for any purpose, subject to the conditions listed in subdivision (b).(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), the after-acquired lands shall remain subject to the terms and conditions of the granting statutes and the public trust doctrine.(b) (1) The port may lease after-acquired lands in Jack London Square for a nontrust use only if it finds that all of the following conditions will be met:(A) Port revenues derived from a nontrust use shall be used exclusively for trust-consistent purposes, including, but not limited to, seating, plazas, and wayfinding, and to support equitable public access and visitor-serving programming for a wide range of visitors.(B) Nontrust uses will not impair or harm existing public access or public trust uses and are intended to attract the statewide public to Jack London Square and the waterfront to promote increased use and enjoyment of the area.(C) The nontrust use lease is for fair market value.(D) The nontrust use lease is consistent with the terms of the granting statutes and public trust doctrine, except for use restrictions pursuant to subdivision (a).(E) The nontrust use leases for each parcel are designed to result in a dynamic, well-balanced tenant mix that promotes, fosters, and enhances public trust uses in Jack London Square.(F) The term of those nontrust leases shall not extend beyond February 1, 2066.(2) The port shall make the findings pursuant to paragraph (1) for each proposed nontrust lease at a public meeting, and the port shall not delegate authority to make these findings to any other entity, including a ground lessee. Any nontrust lease or lease amendment entered into without the port making the findings required by this paragraph shall be void.(c) On February 2, 2066, the use restrictions of the granting statutes and public trust doctrine shall resume for all after-acquired lands, and, as of that date the provisions of this section shall become inoperative.(d) On or before January 15, 2027, and every year thereafter until February 2, 2066, the port shall provide the commission with a detailed narrative statement including all of the following information:(1) A list of tenants in Jack London Square, categorized as either consistent or inconsistent with the public trust use restrictions including details regarding the square footage for each tenant’s lease area, lease term, and the overall square footage for each tenant-occupied structure.(2) A map showing the distribution and location of nontrust use leases.(3) The overall economic health and performance of Jack London Square.(4) Projections of the future economic performance of Jack London Square based on the then-current tenant mix.(5) A description of public access improvements at Jack London Square and how these improvements promote equitable public access to and use and enjoyment of the waterfront.(6) The use of revenue derived from nontrust use leases.(e) The terms of the Stipulated Judgment are held in abeyance for after-acquired lands subject to this act until February 1, 2066. On February 2, 2066, the Stipulated Judgment shall apply in full force and effect. The Stipulated Judgment is otherwise unaffected by this act.(f) (1) Privately funded tenant improvements on land leased pursuant to this act shall be subject to the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code if either of the following requirements is satisfied:(A) The project involves construction work with costs in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(B) The project involves alteration, demolition, repair, or maintenance work with costs in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).(2) Commencing on January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the thresholds in this subdivision shall be adjusted to reflect changes in the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers.(3) The port shall provide written notice of these requirements to all lessees, sublessees, and prospective lessees.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act is designed to address the unique and limited circumstances of Jack London Square and that this act sets no precedent for any other granted lands or other public trust lands in the state.